Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 9. Recounts and Contest of Elections

§ 2601.
Recount threshold.

In an election for federal office, statewide office, county office, or State Senator, if the difference between the number of votes cast for a winning candidate and the number of votes cast for a losing candidate is two percent or less of the total votes cast for all the candidates for an office, divided by the number of persons to be elected, that losing candidate shall have the right to have the votes for that office recounted.
(a) (1) In an election for federal office, statewide office, county office, or State Senator, if the difference between the number of votes cast for a winning candidate and the number of votes cast for a losing candidate is two percent or less of the total votes cast for all the candidates for an office, divided by the number of persons to be elected, that losing candidate shall have the right to have the votes for that office recounted.

In an election for State Representative, if the difference between the number of votes cast for a winning candidate and the number of votes cast for a losing candidate is five percent or less of the total votes cast for all the candidates for an office, divided by the number of persons to be elected, that losing candidate shall have the right to have the votes for that office recounted.

In the case of a recount for a local election, the threshold and procedures for conducting the recount shall be as provided in chapter 55, subchapter 3 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 89;

2009, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 10, 2010;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

2017, No. 50

, § 1;

2019, No. 67

, § 16.

§ 2602.
Petitions for recounts; setting date of recount.

[Repealed.]

In the case of recounts described in subsection 2601(a) of this subchapter, the following procedure shall apply.

A petition for a recount shall be filed within seven calendar days after the election.

The petition shall be filed with:

the Civil Division of the Superior Court, Washington County, in the case of candidates for State or congressional office, or for a presidential election; or

the Superior Court in any county in which votes were cast for the office to be recounted, in the case of any other office.

The petition shall be supported, if possible, by a certified copy of the certificate of election prepared by the canvassing committee, verifying the total number of votes cast and the number of votes cast for each candidate.

The Superior Court shall:
(c) (1) The Superior Court shall:

set the date of the recount to be:

five business days after the court receives the petition, in the case of a primary recount; or

10 business days after the court receives the petition, in the case of a general election recount; and

notify all candidates of the recount date no later than the next business day after the petition is received.

The Superior Court shall forward a copy of the petition to the county clerk.
(2) (A) The Superior Court shall forward a copy of the petition to the county clerk.

The court shall order the town clerk or clerks having custody of the ballots to be recounted or their designees to transport the ballots and a copy of the entrance checklist from the election to be recounted to the county clerks of their respective counties before the day set for the recount.

The county clerk shall store all ballots, still in their sealed containers, in his or her vault until the day of the recount.

-(i) [Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 90-93;

1985, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 4;

1985, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

1989, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2007, No. 54

, § 13;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 140;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

2017, No. 50

, § 1.

§ 2602a.
Appointment of recount committee.

Upon receipt of a petition, the county clerk shall notify all candidates for the office that is the subject of the recount, advising them to each submit immediately a list of a minimum of 10 nominees for individuals to serve on a recount committee.
(a) (1) Upon receipt of a petition, the county clerk shall notify all candidates for the office that is the subject of the recount, advising them to each submit immediately a list of a minimum of 10 nominees for individuals to serve on a recount committee.

If a list of nominees is not delivered to the county clerk within two business days, the clerk shall notify the appropriate candidates that they have 24 hours to submit lists of nominees for individuals to serve on the recount committee.
(2) (A) If a list of nominees is not delivered to the county clerk within two business days, the clerk shall notify the appropriate candidates that they have 24 hours to submit lists of nominees for individuals to serve on the recount committee.

If the petitioning candidate fails to submit a complete list of nominees by this deadline, the recount shall not move forward.

If any other candidate fails to submit a complete list of nominees, the county clerk shall request additional nominees from the other candidates.

The Superior Court shall make a minimum of 12 appointments to the recount committee from among those nominated under this section, with the number of appointments based on the number of votes to be recounted and a goal of completing the recount within one day.
(b) (1) The Superior Court shall make a minimum of 12 appointments to the recount committee from among those nominated under this section, with the number of appointments based on the number of votes to be recounted and a goal of completing the recount within one day.

In making these appointments, the court shall appoint an equal number of persons representing each candidate, to the extent practicable.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2009, No. 40

, § 3, eff. May 26, 2009;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

2017, No. 50

, § 1.

§ 2602b.
Assignment of duties; recount materials.

The county clerk, with the support of the Secretary of State, shall supervise the recount and shall recruit town clerks or their designees to serve as impartial assistants to the county clerk for operating the vote tabulators and shall consult with the Secretary of State to identify any vote tabulators to be used.
(a) (1) The county clerk, with the support of the Secretary of State, shall supervise the recount and shall recruit town clerks or their designees to serve as impartial assistants to the county clerk for operating the vote tabulators and shall consult with the Secretary of State to identify any vote tabulators to be used.

The county clerk may appoint a sufficient number of additional impartial assistants to perform tasks that have not been assigned to recount committee members.

On each day of the recount, the town clerk of any town subject to the recount shall be available to the county clerk in person or by telephone to answer any questions the county clerk may have regarding that town’s election.

The county clerk shall assign committee members to the following teams:
(b) (1) The county clerk shall assign committee members to the following teams:

counting teams comprising at least four persons each, consisting of an equal number of persons representing each candidate, to the extent possible;

one vote tabulator team, comprising two persons, each of whom represents a different candidate; and

one clerk observer team, comprising two persons, one of whom is from the list of the petitioning candidate and one of whom, if possible, is from the list of the winning candidate who received the lowest number of votes.

Any additional team members shall remain unassigned and shall be used as necessary on the day of the recount.

The Secretary of State shall provide to the recount committee:

fresh seals, manila tags, tally sheets, summary sheets for each town, and other material deemed appropriate by the Secretary of State; and

the official return of votes for each town subject to the recount.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

2015, No. 30

, § 20, eff. May 26, 2015;

2017, No. 50

, § 1.

§ 2602c.
Preparation for recount; general rules.

Recount area; preserving order.

The county clerk shall designate an area within which the recount shall take place.
(1) (A) The county clerk shall designate an area within which the recount shall take place.

Persons who are not committee members or who have not been designated as impartial assistants by the county clerk shall be permitted to view the recount in progress, but shall not be permitted within the recount area.

The county clerk shall preserve order. If a person, after notice, is persistently disorderly and refuses to withdraw from the premises, the county clerk may cause the person to be removed from the premises.

Preliminary requirements. Before the recount begins and any containers are opened:

Explaining procedures. The county clerk shall explain the recount procedures that are to be followed and shall answer questions relating to such procedures.

Blank ballots; vote tabulator test.

The county clerk shall obtain blank ballots from the town clerks of the towns subject to the recount. These blank ballots shall be used as test ballots to perform the vote tabulator test described in this subdivision (2).

The vote tabulator team shall perform a test of the vote tabulators that will be used by marking and feeding into each tabulator a minimum of 10 test ballots. The test ballots shall be marked with various votes for each candidate for the office subject to the recount.
(B) (i) The vote tabulator team shall perform a test of the vote tabulators that will be used by marking and feeding into each tabulator a minimum of 10 test ballots. The test ballots shall be marked with various votes for each candidate for the office subject to the recount.

If more than one memory card is to be used, such a test shall be performed for each memory card.

If a vote tabulator does not tabulate these votes accurately, it shall not be used.

Once the test is completed, these ballots and the tabulator tape containing the results of the test shall be sealed in an envelope that shall be dated and marked “TEST BALLOTS—DO NOT COUNT.” This envelope shall then be kept separate from the rest of the containers.

Tables. Each team shall have a separate table and the county clerk shall have a separate table, and all of these tables shall be spaced apart.

Separating containers, polling places, and towns. Each recount team shall:

recount the contents of one container before opening another container at its table;

recount the contents of all the containers relating to one polling place before moving to those of another polling place; and

complete the recount for one town before moving to material relating to another town.

Recording containers. For each town, the number of containers shall be counted and recorded on the summary sheet for that town.

Inspecting containers and seals.

Containers. Before opening, each container shall be inspected, and if no tag is present, replacement manila tags shall be affixed, specifying date of election and name of town and polling place.

Seals.

Each seal shall be inspected to see if it is intact, and the county clerk shall attach to any container with a defective seal a tag stating that the seal was defective and containing the information that was contained on the defective seal.

If a seal number does not match the seal number reported by the town clerk on the official return of votes, the county clerk shall contact the town clerk to request an explanation for that difference. The county clerk shall record any explanation on the summary sheet for that town.

Uncounted containers. Uncounted containers shall be kept in one part of the room and moved to the other side as they are counted.

Checklist container. If there is more than one container from a polling place, the county clerk shall open first the container that is identified as containing the checklist, if applicable.

Opening containers. The county clerk shall empty the contents of each container onto his or her table in the presence of the clerk observer team.

Materials not to be distributed. The county clerk shall ensure that teams are not given, and the teams shall not count:

ballots marked defective or contained in a defective ballot envelope;

unused ballots that were not distributed to voters; or

ballots returned by voters who requested replacement ballots, or ballots contained in a replaced ballot envelope.

Recording defective ballots. In the presence of the clerk observer team, the county clerk shall mark the number of defective ballots from the official return of votes for each town on the summary sheet for that town.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2001, No. 6

, § 12(a), eff. April 10, 2001;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

2017, No. 50

, § 1.

§ 2602d.
Review of official return of votes; examination of checklist.

The county clerk shall review the official return of votes for each town, record on the summary sheet for each town the number of ballots counted and the number of voters checked off the checklist on the town’s return, and if those two numbers are the same, the checklist for that town shall not be examined.
(a) (1) The county clerk shall review the official return of votes for each town, record on the summary sheet for each town the number of ballots counted and the number of voters checked off the checklist on the town’s return, and if those two numbers are the same, the checklist for that town shall not be examined.

If those two numbers for a town are not the same, the checklist may be examined in accordance with the following provisions of this section, if requested by one of the candidates subject to the recount.

The checklist from the first container shall be assigned to a team. Two persons who represent different candidates, each acting independently, shall examine the checklist and determine how many voters voted at the polling place, repeating the process until they agree on a number or until they agree to disagree on a number.

Then the checklist shall be examined by the remaining members of the team, repeating the process until they agree on a number or they agree to disagree on the number.

The results obtained from the two subgroups will be compared and if they do not match, the process shall be repeated until there is agreement among all the members of the team or until team members agree to disagree.

The number finally determined by a majority of team members shall be submitted to the county clerk in the presence of the clerk observer team, together with an indication of the nature and extent of any disagreement.

The county clerk shall note on the summary sheet for the town the number finally determined, together with a note indicating that the number of people appearing as having voted on the checklist was subject to dispute, if one or more team members did not agree with the number submitted.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

2017, No. 50

, § 1.

§ 2602e.
Sorting ballots; ballot review; recount of removed ballots by hand.

Sorting ballots.

While the checklist is being examined, if applicable under section 2602d of this subchapter, after emptying a container onto his or her table, the county clerk shall separate ballots from the container into a number of batches equal to the number of counting teams, with each batch being of approximately equal size.

Each counting team shall take a batch of ballots from the county clerk’s table to the counting team’s table.

Two persons who represent different candidates on a counting team shall sort that batch into stacks of 50 ballots, and the remaining members of the team shall recount each stack to ensure that there are 50 ballots in it.

The counting teams shall combine any ballots not placed into a stack of 50, and one of those counting teams shall separate those combined ballots into stacks of 50 and recount them in accordance with subdivision (3) of this subsection.
(4) (A) The counting teams shall combine any ballots not placed into a stack of 50, and one of those counting teams shall separate those combined ballots into stacks of 50 and recount them in accordance with subdivision (3) of this subsection.

For any final stack that contains fewer than 50 ballots, the county clerk shall affix to the top of that stack a note indicating how many ballots are contained in it.

Ballot review and removal.

For each stack, a counting team shall review each ballot within the stack and remove from that stack each ballot upon which, for the office in question, the voter recorded his or her vote or votes in that race in any manner other than completely filling in the oval to the right of a preprinted candidate’s name.
(1) (A) For each stack, a counting team shall review each ballot within the stack and remove from that stack each ballot upon which, for the office in question, the voter recorded his or her vote or votes in that race in any manner other than completely filling in the oval to the right of a preprinted candidate’s name.

Each counting team shall also remove any plain paper or damaged ballots.

A ballot shall be removed only if at least two members of the counting team agree to its removal.

A ballot without markings for the office in question shall not be removed.

A ballot that is not removed upon this first review shall not be reviewed again.

Delivery of remaining ballots.

Each counting team shall then attach to that stack a note indicating the number of ballots remaining in the stack.

The county clerk shall deliver those remaining ballots to the vote tabulator team.

Hand count of removed ballots; questionable votes.

Each counting team shall then separate the removed ballots into stacks of 50 in accordance with the process set forth in subdivision (a)(3) of this section.

The counting team shall then hand count the votes for the office in question on the removed ballots, and mark the results on a tally sheet for each stack of 50 removed ballots and any remaining stack with less than 50.

This hand count shall be in accordance with the rules for counting ballots set forth in section 2587 of this chapter, except that if two persons on the counting team do not agree on how to count a vote, the ballot shall be set aside as containing a questionable vote.
(3) (A) This hand count shall be in accordance with the rules for counting ballots set forth in section 2587 of this chapter, except that if two persons on the counting team do not agree on how to count a vote, the ballot shall be set aside as containing a questionable vote.

For any questionable vote, a copy of the ballot shall be made, and this copy shall be clearly marked on its face, identifying it as a copy. Once the recount of a container is completed, any such copies shall be placed on the top of the other ballots and shall remain together with the other ballots.
(B) (i) For any questionable vote, a copy of the ballot shall be made, and this copy shall be clearly marked on its face, identifying it as a copy. Once the recount of a container is completed, any such copies shall be placed on the top of the other ballots and shall remain together with the other ballots.

Each original ballot with a questionable vote shall be attached to a note that identifies it by town, county, polling place, and container seal number. The originals of these ballots with questionable votes shall be clipped to the summary sheet for that town, along with a copy of the official return of votes, and submitted to the court for a final decision.

The county clerk shall record the number of ballots containing questionable votes to be submitted to the court on the summary sheet for the town.

At the end of the hand count for a container, two persons from each counting team who represent different candidates shall deliver any tally sheets from their table to the county clerk in the presence of the clerk observer team.

The county clerk, in the presence of the clerk observer team, shall record the totals from each tally sheet onto the summary sheet for the town.

This process shall be completed for as many containers as there are for each town.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 50

, § 1.

§ 2602f.
Recount of remaining ballots by vote tabulator.

The vote tabulator team shall operate any vote tabulator used in the recount, with the assistance of the recruited town clerks or designees.

The vote tabulator memory card or cards shall be programmed to read only the votes for the election that is the subject of the recount.

At the same time as any removed ballots are being hand counted, the vote tabulator team shall take any ballots from each container delivered to them and feed them through a vote tabulator.
(c) (1) At the same time as any removed ballots are being hand counted, the vote tabulator team shall take any ballots from each container delivered to them and feed them through a vote tabulator.

The vote tabulator team shall attempt to feed ballots into the vote tabulator in the same direction.

If the tabulator refuses a ballot, the vote tabulator team shall announce that occurrence and whether the ballot was counted, and may override that refusal.
(3) (A) If the tabulator refuses a ballot, the vote tabulator team shall announce that occurrence and whether the ballot was counted, and may override that refusal.

If the tabulator continues to refuse the ballot, the vote tabulator team shall announce that occurrence and return it to a counting team for hand counting.

This process shall be used until all ballots from a container have been tabulated by a vote tabulator or otherwise returned to a counting team for hand counting.

This process shall be repeated until all ballots from a town have been fed through a vote tabulator.
(d) (1) This process shall be repeated until all ballots from a town have been fed through a vote tabulator.

If there is more than one container for a town, the tabulator tape shall not be printed until ballots from all containers for that town have been tabulated.

After all ballots from a town have been tabulated by a vote tabulator, the vote tabulator team shall print the tabulator tape containing the unofficial results for that town, and deliver that tabulator tape to the county clerk in the presence of the clerk observer team.
(e) (1) After all ballots from a town have been tabulated by a vote tabulator, the vote tabulator team shall print the tabulator tape containing the unofficial results for that town, and deliver that tabulator tape to the county clerk in the presence of the clerk observer team.

The county clerk shall then record the totals from the tabulator tape onto the summary sheet for the town in the same manner that he or she recorded the individual tally sheet totals from the hand-counted ballots.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

2015, No. 30

, § 22, eff. May 26, 2015;

2017, No. 50

, § 1.

§ 2602g.
Repealed. 2013, No. 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 43.

§ 2602h.
Completing the tally.

The county clerk shall return all ballots to their container, seal the container, record the seal number on the summary sheet, and write “recounted” and specify the date of the recount on the tag.

In the presence of the clerk observer team, the county clerk shall add together the hand count and vote tabulator totals for each town, as recorded on the tally sheets and vote tabulator tape submitted to him or her, record those totals on the summary sheet for that town, and affix his or her seal to that summary sheet.

The county clerk shall compare the number of ballots recounted for that town with the number of ballots counted at the town as reported on the official return of votes, and with the number of voters who voted at that town according to the checklist examination, as applicable under section 2602d of this subchapter and recorded by the county clerk on the summary sheet in accordance with that section.
(c) (1) The county clerk shall compare the number of ballots recounted for that town with the number of ballots counted at the town as reported on the official return of votes, and with the number of voters who voted at that town according to the checklist examination, as applicable under section 2602d of this subchapter and recorded by the county clerk on the summary sheet in accordance with that section.

If these numbers differ, the county clerk shall note the amount of the difference on the summary sheets for that town.

If there is more than one town subject to the recount:

this process shall be repeated for each town; and

once all towns have been recounted, the county clerk shall add together the totals from each town and record the total for all towns on a master summary sheet and affix his or her seal to that sheet.

The county clerk shall send the summary sheets for all towns together with any master summary sheet, the ballots marked defective or contained in a defective ballot envelope, and any original ballots containing questionable votes to the court and obtain a receipt for that delivery.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

2017, No. 50

, § 1.

§ 2602i.
Costs.

Recount committee members and assistants designated by the county clerk shall be paid by the State at the same per diem and mileage rates and according to the same procedures by which jurors are paid.

These and other necessary expenses, as approved by the court, shall be paid by the State through the Court Administrator’s Office.
(b) (1) These and other necessary expenses, as approved by the court, shall be paid by the State through the Court Administrator’s Office.

The Secretary of State shall bear the costs of recounts conducted under this subchapter and shall reimburse the Court Administrator’s Office.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

2017, No. 50

, § 1.

§ 2602j.
Court hearing and judgment.

, (b)[Repealed.]

(c)

Candidates and their attorneys shall be given the opportunity to present evidence to the court relating to the conduct of the recount, how to count questionable votes, and the marking of any ballot as defective in accordance with section 2547 or subsection 2587(d) of this title.

(d)

On the day of the hearing, the town clerk of any town subject to the recount shall be available in person or by telephone to answer any questions regarding the town’s election.

(e)

If the court determines that any violations of recount procedures have occurred and that they may have affected the outcome of the recount, a new recount shall be ordered.

(f)

After such hearings or arguments as may be indicated under the circumstances and after it has made a final decision on any questionable votes or defective ballots, the Superior Court, within five working days, shall:

issue a judgment, which shall supersede any certificate of election previously issued;

send a certified copy of the judgment to the Secretary of State; and

return to the county clerk any ballots containing questionable votes and defective ballots that had been forwarded to the court.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

2017, No. 50

, § 1.

§ 2602k.
Recount ties.

If a recount of a primary election results in a tie, the provisions of subsection 2369(b) of this title shall apply.
(a) (1) If a recount of a primary election results in a tie, the provisions of subsection 2369(b) of this title shall apply.

If a recount of a public question results in a tie, a runoff election shall not be held, and the question shall be certified not to have passed.

If a recount of a general election results in a tie, the provisions of this section shall apply, and the court shall order a runoff election to be held, within three weeks of the recount, on a date set by the court.

The only candidates who shall appear on the ballot at the runoff election shall be those who tied in the previous election.

The runoff election shall be considered a separate election for the purpose of voter registration under chapter 43 of this title.

[Repealed.]

Warnings for a runoff election shall be posted as required by subchapter 5 of this chapter, except that the warnings shall be posted not less than 10 days before the runoff election.

The conduct of a runoff election shall be as provided in this chapter for general elections.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

2017, No. 50

, § 1;

2019, No. 67

, § 17.

§ 2602
l
.
Repealed. 2013, No. 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 43.

§ 2602m.
Storage and return of election materials.

After the recount, the county clerk shall store the sealed containers and any other recount materials in the county clerk’s vault until returned to the towns.
(a) (1) After the recount, the county clerk shall store the sealed containers and any other recount materials in the county clerk’s vault until returned to the towns.

The county clerk shall release all containers to the respective town clerks after issuance of the court’s judgment, together with a copy of the judgment.

The respective town clerks or their designees shall transport the containers to the towns from which they came.

Upon receiving from the court any ballots containing questionable votes and defective ballots, the county clerk shall keep them in a sealed container for a period of two years.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 50

, § 1.

§ 2603.
Contest of elections.

The result of an election for any office, other than for the General Assembly, or public question may be contested by any legal voter entitled to vote on the office or public question to be contested.

A contest is initiated by filing a complaint with a Superior Court alleging:

that errors were committed in the conduct of the election or in count or return of votes, sufficient to change the ultimate result;

that there was fraud in the electoral process, sufficient to change the ultimate result; or

that for any other reason, the result of the election is not valid.

The complaint shall be filed within 15 days after the election in question, or if there is a recount, within 10 days after the court issues its judgment on the recount. In the case of candidates for State or congressional office, for a presidential election, or for a statewide public question, the complaint shall be filed with the Civil Division of the Superior Court, Washington County. In the case of any other candidate or public question, the complaint shall be filed with the Superior Court in any county in which votes were cast for the office or question being challenged.

The Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure shall apply to contests of elections, except that such cases shall be placed upon a special calendar, and hearings shall be scheduled on a priority basis, as public policy demands that such questions be resolved promptly.

After hearing, the court shall issue findings of fact and a judgment, which shall supersede any certificate of election previously issued. If the court finds just cause, the court shall grant appropriate relief, which may include ordering a recount, or ordering a new election. If during the hearing the court receives credible evidence of criminal conduct, the court shall order a transcript of all or part of the testimony to be forwarded to the proper State’s Attorney. If a new election is ordered, the court shall set a date for it, after consulting with the Secretary of State; in ordering a new election, the court shall have authority to issue appropriate orders, either to provide for special cases not covered by law, or to supersede provisions of law that may conflict with the needs of the particular situation.

The court shall send a certified copy of its findings of fact and judgment to the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 94, 95;

1981, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

1985, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1985, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 141.

§ 2604.
Repealed.
1985, No. 148 (Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2605.
House of Representatives.

A candidate for the office of Representative to the General Assembly in the general election, or any elected town officer in the representative district, or any 25 voters in the representative district may request the House of Representatives to exercise its constitutional authority to judge the elections and qualifications of its own members, by filing a written request with the Secretary of State specifying the candidate or candidates whose election is being challenged. The request must be filed not later than the latest of the following:

20 days after the date of the election; or

10 days after a final court judgment, if there is a recount under section 2602 of this title.

The Secretary of State shall notify the Attorney General, who shall investigate the facts, take such depositions as may be necessary, prepare an opinion on the law and facts, and send his or her report and opinion to the Clerk of the House at least 10 days before the General Assembly convenes.
(b) (1) The Secretary of State shall notify the Attorney General, who shall investigate the facts, take such depositions as may be necessary, prepare an opinion on the law and facts, and send his or her report and opinion to the Clerk of the House at least 10 days before the General Assembly convenes.

If the Attorney General needs additional time to conduct the investigation or prepare the report and opinion required by this subsection, he or she shall alert the Clerk of the House of that need and the date by which he or she plans to submit the report and opinion.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 96;

2017, No. 50

, § 47.

§ 2606.
Senate.

A candidate for the office of State Senator in the general election or any 100 voters in the senatorial district may request the Senate to exercise its constitutional authority to judge the elections and qualifications of its own members by filing a written request with the Secretary of State specifying the candidate or candidates whose election is being challenged. The request must be filed not later than the latest of the following:

20 days after the date of the election; or

10 days after a final court judgment, if there is a recount under section 2602 of this title.

The Secretary of State shall notify the Attorney General, who shall investigate the facts, take such depositions as may be necessary, prepare an opinion on the law and facts, and send his or her report and opinion to the Secretary of the Senate at least 10 days before the General Assembly convenes.
(b) (1) The Secretary of State shall notify the Attorney General, who shall investigate the facts, take such depositions as may be necessary, prepare an opinion on the law and facts, and send his or her report and opinion to the Secretary of the Senate at least 10 days before the General Assembly convenes.

If the Attorney General needs additional time to conduct the investigation or prepare the report and opinion required by this subsection, he or she shall alert the Secretary of the Senate of that need and the date by which he or she plans to submit the report and opinion.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 97;

2017, No. 50

, § 48.

§ 2607.
Canvassing committee.

The canvassing committee for State and national offices shall meet at 10:00 a.m. one week after the day of election to certify the results of the presidential primary. The chair of each major political party shall be given a copy of the official certificate of votes for the election.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 38

, § 1.